Utah statutes.
76-5-301.1.   Child kidnapping.

(1)  An actor commits child kidnapping if the actor intentionally or knowingly, without authority of law, and by any means and in any manner, seizes, confines, detains, or transports a child under the age of 14 without the consent of the victim's parent or guardian, or the consent of a person acting in loco parentis.

(2)  Violation of Section 76-5-303 is not a violation of this section.

(3)  Child kidnapping is a first degree felony punishable by a term of imprisonment of:

(a)  except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), (3)(c), or (4), not less than 15 years and which may be for life;

(b)  except as provided in Subsection (3)(c) or (4), life without parole, if the trier of fact finds that during the course of the commission of the child kidnapping the defendant caused serious bodily injury to another; or

(c)  life without parole, if the trier of fact finds that at the time of the commission of the child kidnapping the defendant was previously convicted of a grievous sexual offense.

(4)  If, when imposing a sentence under Subsection (3)(a) or (b), a court finds that a lesser term than the term described in Subsection (3)(a) or (b) is in the interests of justice and states the reasons for this finding on the record, the court may impose a term of imprisonment of not less than:

(a)  for purposes of Subsection (3)(b), 15 years and which may be for life; or

(b)  for purposes of Subsection (3)(a) or (b):

(i)  10 years and which may be for life; or

(ii)  six years and which may be for life.

(5)  The provisions of Subsection (4) do not apply when a person is sentenced under Subsection (3)(c).

(6)  Imprisonment under this section is mandatory in accordance with Section 76-3-406.

